North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 11. Legislative Intern Program.

§ 120-56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.10, effective July 1, 2011.

History.

1969, c. 32; 1995, c. 490, s. 29; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.10, effective July 1, 2011.

§ 120-57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 19, effective July 12, 2017.

History.

1969, c. 32; 1979, c. 1067, s. 1; 2007-201, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 19, effective July 12, 2017.